Illinois, session 104th, HB2892.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Section 11a-10 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/11a-10)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-10)7    Sec. 11a-10. Procedures preliminary to hearing. 8    (a) Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to Section 911a-8, the court shall set a date and place for hearing to take 10place within 30 days. The court shall appoint a guardian ad 11litem to report to the court concerning the respondent's best 12interests consistent with the provisions of this Section, 13except that the appointment of a guardian ad litem shall not be 14required when the court determines that such appointment is 15not necessary for the protection of the respondent or a 16reasonably informed decision on the petition. If the guardian 17ad litem is not a licensed attorney, he or she shall be 18qualified, by training or experience, to work with or advocate 19for persons with developmental disabilities, the mentally ill, 20persons with physical disabilities, the elderly, or persons 21with a disability due to mental deterioration, depending on 22the type of disability that is alleged in the petition. The 23petitioner, cross-petitioner, or respondent is entitled to one   HB2892- 2 -LRB104 10289 JRC 20363 b1substitution of guardian ad litem without cause as a matter of 2right. An application for substitution of guardian ad litem 3may be made by oral or written motion and must be granted if 4the motion is made at any time before the guardian ad litem 5files an appearance or at the first court appearance after the 6guardian ad litem is appointed, whichever is later. The court 7may allow the guardian ad litem reasonable compensation. The 8guardian ad litem may consult with a person who by training or 9experience is qualified to work with persons with a 10developmental disability, persons with mental illness, persons 11with physical disabilities, or persons with a disability due 12to mental deterioration, depending on the type of disability 13that is alleged. The guardian ad litem shall personally 14observe the respondent prior to the hearing and shall inform 15him orally and in writing of the contents of the petition and 16of his rights, including providing a copy of the notice of 17rights required under subsection (e). The guardian ad litem 18shall also attempt to elicit the respondent's position 19concerning the adjudication of disability, the proposed 20guardian, a proposed change in residential placement, changes 21in care that might result from the guardianship, and other 22areas of inquiry deemed appropriate by the court. 23Notwithstanding any provision in the Mental Health and 24Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality Act or any other 25law, a guardian ad litem shall have the right to inspect and 26copy any medical or mental health record of the respondent   HB2892- 3 -LRB104 10289 JRC 20363 b1which the guardian ad litem deems necessary, provided that the 2information so disclosed shall not be utilized for any other 3purpose nor be redisclosed except in connection with the 4proceedings. At or before the hearing, the guardian ad litem 5shall file a written report detailing his or her observations 6of the respondent, the responses of the respondent to any of 7the inquiries detailed in this Section, the opinion of the 8guardian ad litem or other professionals with whom the 9guardian ad litem consulted concerning the appropriateness of 10guardianship, and any other material issue discovered by the 11guardian ad litem. The guardian ad litem shall appear at the 12hearing and testify as to any issues presented in his or her 13report.14    (b) The court (1) may appoint counsel for the respondent, 15if the court finds that the interests of the respondent will be 16best served by the appointment, and (2) shall appoint counsel 17upon the respondent's request or if the respondent takes a 18position adverse to that of the guardian ad litem. The 19respondent shall be permitted to obtain the appointment of 20counsel either at the hearing or by any written or oral request 21communicated to the court prior to the hearing. The summons 22shall inform the respondent of this right to obtain appointed 23counsel. The court may allow counsel for the respondent 24reasonable compensation.25    (c) The allocation of guardian ad litem fees and costs is 26within the discretion of the court. No legal fees, appointed   HB2892- 4 -LRB104 10289 JRC 20363 b1counsel fees, guardian ad litem fees, or costs shall be 2assessed against the Office of the State Guardian, the public 3guardian, an adult protective services agency, the Department 4of Children and Family Services, or the agency designated by 5the Governor under Section 1 of the Protection and Advocacy 6for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Act.7    (d) The hearing may be held at such convenient place as the 8court directs, including at a facility in which the respondent 9resides.10    (e) Unless he is the petitioner, the respondent shall be 11personally served with a copy of the petition and a summons not 12less than 14 days before the hearing. The summons shall be 13printed in large, bold type and shall include the following:14NOTICE OF RIGHTS OF RESPONDENT15    You have been named as a respondent in a guardianship 16petition asking that you be declared a person with a 17disability. If the court grants the petition, a guardian will 18be appointed for you. A copy of the guardianship petition is 19attached for your convenience.20The date and time of the hearing are: 21The place where the hearing will occur is: 22The Judge's name and phone number is:23    If a guardian is appointed for you, the guardian may be 24given the right to make all important personal decisions for 25you, such as where you may live, what medical treatment you may 26receive, what places you may visit, and who may visit you. A   HB2892- 5 -LRB104 10289 JRC 20363 b1guardian may also be given the right to control and manage your 2money and other property, including your home, if you own one. 3You may lose the right to make these decisions for yourself.4    You have the following legal rights:5        (1) You have the right to be present at the court 6    hearing.7        (2) You have the right to be represented by a lawyer, 8    either one that you retain, or one appointed by the Judge.9        (3) You have the right to ask for a jury of six persons 10    to hear your case.11        (4) You have the right to present evidence to the 12    court and to confront and cross-examine witnesses.13        (5) You have the right to ask the Judge to appoint an 14    independent expert to examine you and give an opinion 15    about your need for a guardian.16        (6) You have the right to ask that the court hearing be 17    closed to the public.18        (7) You have the right to tell the court whom you 19    prefer to have for your guardian.20        (8) You have the right to ask a judge to find that 21    although you lack some capacity to make your own 22    decisions, you can make other decisions, and therefore it 23    is best for the court to appoint only a limited guardian 24    for you. 25    You do not have to attend the court hearing if you do not 26want to be there. If you do not attend, the Judge may appoint a   HB2892- 6 -LRB104 10289 JRC 20363 b1guardian if the Judge finds that a guardian would be of benefit 2to you. The hearing will not be postponed or canceled if you do 3not attend. If you are unable to attend the hearing in person 4or you will suffer harm if you attend, the Judge can decide to 5hold the hearing at a place that is convenient. The Judge can 6also follow the rule of the Supreme Court of this State, or its 7local equivalent, and decide if a video conference is 8appropriate. 9    IT IS VERY IMPORTANT THAT YOU ATTEND THE HEARING IF YOU DO 10NOT WANT A GUARDIAN OR IF YOU WANT SOMEONE OTHER THAN THE 11PERSON NAMED IN THE GUARDIANSHIP PETITION TO BE YOUR GUARDIAN. 12IF YOU DO NOT WANT A GUARDIAN OR IF YOU HAVE ANY OTHER 13PROBLEMS, YOU SHOULD CONTACT AN ATTORNEY OR COME TO COURT AND 14TELL THE JUDGE.15    Service of summons and the petition may be made by a 16private person 18 years of age or over who is not a party to 17the action.18[END OF FORM] 19    (f) Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be 20given by the petitioner by mail or in person to those persons, 21including the proposed guardian, whose names and addresses 22appear in the petition and who do not waive notice, not less 23than 14 days before the hearing. 24(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22; 102-191, eff. 1-1-22; 25102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)